Maryland, session 2025, SB0087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–746.
(A) (1) The Department shall conduct annually a scientific survey to determine
the relative abundance of striped bass or rockfish of approximately 18 inches in length that
are in the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries.
(2) The survey shall be conducted in areas that are used by the Department
to determine its young–of–the–year index of striped bass or rockfish.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0087*

SENATE BILL 87
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) CONDUCT THE ANNUAL YOUNG–OF–THE–YEAR JUVENILE SURVEY
OF STRIPED BASS OR ROCKFISH AT BETWEEN 12 AND 20, INCLUSIVE, SAMPLING
SITES LOCATED IN THE CENTRAL REGION OF THE MARYLAND WATERS OF THE
CHESAPEAKE BAY IN ADDITION TO SAMPLING SITES IN THE NORTHERN AND
SOUTHERN REGIONS OF THE CHESAPEAKE BAY; AND
(2) LOCATE THE CENTRAL REGION SAMPLING SITES IN ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING WATERS OF THE STATE:
(I) THE MAGOTHY RIVER;
(II) THE SEVERN RIVER;
(III) THE CHESTER RIVER;
(IV) THE SOUTH RIVER;
(V) THE WEST RIVER;
(VI) EASTERN BAY; OR
(VII) THE MILES RIVER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.